New York, session 2025-2026, A7278.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state technology law is amended by adding a new section 2 106-c to read as follows: 3 § 106-c. Use of artificial intelligence programs. 1. As used in this 4 section: 5 a. "artificial intelligence" or "AI" means any machine-based system 6 that makes decisions based on algorithms, machine learning, or any form 7 of data-driven modeling; 8 b. "large language model" or "LLM" means any AI model designed to 9 understand and generate human language based on large datasets; 10 c. "state agency" means any department, board, bureau, division, 11 commission, committee, public benefit corporation, public authority, or 12 other governmental entity of the state; and 13 d. "state-owned entity" means any entity that is owned or controlled 14 by the state, including but not limited to public universities, state- 15 run hospitals, and other state-funded organizations. 16 2. No state agency or state-owned entity shall implement or utilize 17 large language models or any artificial intelligence systems to make 18 decisions that affect individuals' rights, benefits, or services. All 19 decisions affecting individuals' rights, benefits, or services must be 20 made by human personnel of the respective state agency or state-owned 21 entity. 22 3. a. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the use of AI 23 or LLMs in purely advisory capacities, provided that the final decision 24 is made by human personnel. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11025-01-5 A. 7278 2 1 b. The use of AI for data analysis, research, or other non-decision- 2 making purposes is not prohibited by this section. 3 4. Each state agency and state-owned entity shall develop and imple- 4 ment policies and procedures to ensure compliance with this section. 5 5. The attorney general shall have the authority to investigate 6 violations of this section and take appropriate legal action to enforce 7 its provisions. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law.